District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.20

Voluntary surrender of license.

(a)

Any person who is the subject of an investigation into, or a pending proceeding involving, allegations of misconduct may voluntarily surrender his or her registration, license, or certificate to practice in the District, but only by delivering to the Mayor an affidavit stating that the person desires to surrender the registration, license, or certificate and that the action is freely and voluntarily taken, and not the result of duress or coercion.

(b)

Upon receipt of the required affidavit, the Mayor shall enter an order revoking or suspending the registration, license, or certificate of the person.

(c)

The voluntary surrender of a registration, license, or certificate shall not preclude the imposition of civil or criminal penalties against the licensee.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
Delegation of Revocation and Suspension Authority to Board of Real Estate, see Mayor’s Order 2007-125, May 25, 2007 ( 54 DCR 9064).
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.20.